Massachusetts, session 194th, H3626.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the 
Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority, in coordination with the Executive Office of 
Veterans’ Services, shall conduct a study of the impacts, benefits, and costs of a reduced fare 
program for veterans that provides reduced or discounted transit fares to qualifying riders.  
(b) In developing the study, the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority shall 
develop a stakeholder engagement plan and implementation analysis. The engagement plan shall 
ensure engagement with relevant stakeholders and provide opportunities for public input in 
geographically-diverse service areas of the authority. The analysis shall include, but not be 
limited to, an examination of: (i) the number of riders anticipated to benefit from the program; 
(ii) the average reductions of each fare, by mode; (iii) the overall impact on revenue to the 
system; (iv) partnership models for determining eligibility requirements and the verification 
method; and (v) estimated costs associated with the administration and marketing of the 

of 2 13 program. The implementation analysis shall be filed with the clerks of the senate and house of 
representatives, the senate and house committees on ways and means and the joint committee on 
transportation not later than October 15, 2026. 
SECTION 2. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the regional 
transit authority council established in section 27 of chapter 161B of the General Laws, in 
coordination with the secretary of the Executive Office of Veterans’ Services, may provide each 
regional transit authority with assistance to implement a fare program for veterans that provides 
free or discounted transit fares to qualifying riders on all modes of transportation operated by 
each authority. 
(b) In developing fare program for veterans, each regional transit authority shall develop 
a stakeholder engagement plan and an implementation analysis. The engagement plan shall 
ensure engagement with relevant stakeholders and provide opportunities for public input in 
geographically-diverse service areas of the authority. The analysis shall include, but not be 
limited to, an examination of: (i) the number of riders anticipated to benefit from the program; 
(ii) the average reduction of each fare, by mode; (iii) the overall impact on revenue to the system;  
(iv) partnership models for determining eligibility requirements and the verification method; (v) 
any estimated costs associated with the administration and marketing of the program; and (vi) 
consideration of a no-fare option if that would be cheaper to implement.